Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1075
Joint district or learning community; joint affiliated school system; tax levy; certification.

(1) The county board of the county in which is located the schoolhouse or the administrative office of any joint school district or learning community shall make a levy for the school district or learning community, as may be necessary, and the county clerk of that headquarters county shall certify the levy, on or before the date prescribed in section 77-1601, to the county clerk of each county in which is situated any portion of the joint school district or learning community. This section shall apply to all taxes levied on behalf of school districts, including, but not limited to, taxes authorized by sections 10-304, 10-711, 10-716.01, 77-1601, 79-747, 79-1077, 79-1084, 79-1085, 79-1086, 79-10,100, 79-10,110, 79-10,118, 79-10,120, 79-10,122, and 79-10,126.

(2) The county board of the county in which is located the schoolhouse or the administrative office of the high school district of a joint affiliated school system shall make a levy for the joint affiliated school system, as may be necessary, and the county clerk of that headquarters county shall certify the levy, on or before the date prescribed in section 77-1601, to the county clerk of each county in which is situated any portion of the joint affiliated school system. This section shall apply to all taxes levied on behalf of affiliated school systems, including, but not limited to, taxes authorized by sections 10-716.01, 79-1077, and 79-10,110.

Laws 1907, c. 118, § 2, p. 398;

Laws 1913, c. 6, § 2, p. 64;

R.S.1913, § 6742;

C.S.1922, § 6283;

C.S.1929, § 79-215;

R.S.1943, § 79-214;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 73, p. 717;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-434;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 721;

Laws 2001, LB 711, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 96.

For joint recreation facilities in conjunction with city of the second class, see sections 17-156 to 17-162.